Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0227.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 109s. (1) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the department shall request a waiver from the United States Department of Agriculture to exclude soda from the definition of eligible foods under 7 CFR 271.2. If the United States Department of Agriculture grants the waiver requested under this subsection, the department shall prohibit the purchase of soda with benefits provided through the supplemental nutrition assistance program. If the United States Department of Agriculture does not grant the waiver requested under this subsection, the department shall request the waiver annually until the waiver is granted. (2) As used in this section, "soda" means any nonalcoholic beverage that contains natural or artificial sweeteners. Soda does not include a beverage that contains milk or milk substitutes or is greater than 50% vegetable juice or fruit juice by volume.